Utah statutes.
20A-3-101.   Residency and age requirements of voters.

(1)  A person may vote in any regular general election or statewide special election if that person has registered to vote in accordance with Title 20A, Chapter 2, Voter Registration.

(2)  A person may vote in the Western States Presidential Primary election or a regular primary election if:

(a)  that person has registered to vote in accordance with Title 20A, Chapter 2, Voter Registration; and

(b)  that person's political party affiliation, or unaffiliated status, allows the person to vote in the election.

(3)  A person may vote in a municipal general election, municipal primary, in a local special election, in a local district election, and in a bond election if that person:

(a)  has registered to vote in accordance with Title 20A, Chapter 2, Voter Registration; and

(b)  is a resident of a voting district or precinct within the local entity that is holding the election.

